Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 128C.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Video production. new text end new text begin The league must adopt a policy requiring members to allow live and recorded video production of all competitions in extracurricular activities for distribution by public, educational, or governmental access channels operating under chapter 238. The policy may not impair a preexisting contract in effect at the time the policy is adopted. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end